Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.540

[Art. 61] Initial action on the record—General court-martial records.

The convening authority shall refer the record of each general court-martial to the staff judge advocate, who shall submit a written opinion thereon to the convening authority. If the final action of the court has resulted in an acquittal of all charges and specifications, the opinion shall be limited to questions of jurisdiction.

[ 1989 c 48 s 55; 1963 c 220 s 63.]